Maryland, session 2026, HB1439.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
14–701.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Partition by sale” means a court–ordered sale of property, whether by
auction, sealed bids, or open–market sale conducted under § 14–711 of this subtitle.
14–703.
(A) In an action under this subtitle, the court on its own motion or on motion of
any party may issue an order:
(1) For the appointment of an attorney to protect the interest of any party
to the same extent and effect as provided under Rule 2–203 of the Maryland Rules with
respect to individuals not in being;
(2) To require joinder of any additional parties that are necessary or
proper; and
(3) To require that the plaintiff:
(i) Procure a title report supported by an affidavit by the person
making the title search that a complete search of the public records has been performed in
accordance with generally accepted standards of title examination for the appropriate
period as determined by the court, but not less than 60 years; and
(ii) Designate a place where the title report shall be kept for
inspection, use, and copying by the parties.
(B) (1) IF A PLAINTIFF IS NOT REQUIRED TO PROCURE A TITLE REPORT
IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (A)(3) OF THIS SECTION, EACH PARTY SHALL
TIMELY NOTIFY THE COURT OF THE TYPE AND AMOUNT OF EACH OUTSTANDING LIEN
ON THE PROPERTY THAT THE PARTY KNOWS OR SHOULD KNOW OF, INCLUDING ANY
MORTGAGE, DEED OF TRUST, TAX LIEN, AND JUDGMENT LIEN.
(2) THE NOTICE TO THE COURT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL
INCLUDE SUPPORTING DOCUMENTATION FOR EACH OUTSTANDING LIEN ON THE
PROPERTY AND THE AMOUNT OWED.
14–708.

HOUSE BILL 1439 3
(a) If any cotenant requested partition by sale, after the determination of value
under § 14–707 of this subtitle, the court shall send notice to the parties that any cotenant,
except a cotenant that requested partition by sale, may buy all the interests of the cotenants
that requested partition by sale.
(b) (1) Not later than 45 days after the notice is sent under subsection (a) of
this section, any cotenant[, except a] MAY:
(I) IF THE cotenant [that requested] DID NOT REQUEST partition
by sale, [may] give notice to the court that the cotenant elects to buy all the interests of the
cotenants that requested partition by sale; AND
(II) REQUEST THAT THE COURT ADJUST THE PURCHASE PRICE
IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (C)(2)(I) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) TO THE EXTENT POSSIBLE, A COTENANT REQUESTING AN
ADJUSTMENT TO THE PURCHASE PRICE BY THE COURT IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (C)(2)(I) OF THIS SECTION SHALL INCLUDE SUPPORTING
DOCUMENTATION WITH THE REQUEST.
(c) (1) [The] SUBJECT TO AN ADJUSTMENT BY THE COURT IN
ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE purchase price for
each of the interests of a cotenant that requested partition by sale is the PRODUCT OF:
(I) THE value of the entire parcel determined under § 14–707 of this
subtitle [multiplied by the] MINUS THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF EACH OUTSTANDING LIEN
ON THE PROPERTY, IF ANY, INCLUDING A MORTGAGE, DEED OF TRUST, TAX LIEN,
AND JUDGMENT LIEN; AND
(II) THE cotenant’s fractional ownership of the entire parcel.
(2) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
COURT SHALL ADJUST THE PURCHASE PRICE CALCULATED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION IF THE COURT DETERMINES THAT A COTENANT HAS, WITHOUT
EQUITABLE DISTRIBUTION TO OTHER COTENANTS:
1. INCURRED WITHOUT EQUITABLE CONTRIBUTION BY
OTHER COTENANTS, INCURRED NECESSARY COSTS, SUCH AS PROPERTY TAXES,
MORTGAGE PAYMENTS, HOMEOWNERS INSURANCE, OR REQUIRED MAINTENANCE;
OR
2. EARNED WITHOUT EQUITABLE DISTRIBUTION TO
OTHER COTENANTS, EARNED INCOME ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE PROPERTY, SUCH AS
RENTAL INCOME.

HOUSE BILL 1439
(II) BEFORE MAKING A FINAL DETERMINATION OF THE
ADJUSTED PURCHASE PRICE, THE COURT SHALL:
1. NOTIFY ALL COTENANTS OF THE ADJUSTED
PURCHASE PRICE UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH; AND
2. ON REQUEST OF ANY COTENANT, HOLD A HEARING TO
ALLOW ALL COTENANTS TO PRESENT ADDITIONAL EVIDENCE OF NECESSARY COSTS
OR INCOME EARNED FROM THE PROPERTY FOR THE COURT TO CONSIDER.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to any partition action filed before the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.